third_party/hunspell_dictionaries/tg_TG.aff
FLAG num
SFX 50 N 3
SFX 50 0 агор .
SFX 50 0 агоранд .
SFX 50 0 агори .

SFX 51 N 5
SFX 51 0 агорӣ .
SFX 51 0 агории .
SFX 51 0 агориро .
SFX 51 0 агорию .
SFX 51 0 агорияш .

SFX 52 N 1
SFX 52 0 агоре .

SFX 53 N 2
SFX 53 0 агорон .
SFX 53 0 агоронанд .

SFX 54 N 1
SFX 54 0 аде .

SFX 55 N 1
SFX 55 0 адмӣ .

SFX 56 N 1
SFX 56 0 адо .

SFX 57 N 1
SFX 57 0 адон .

SFX 58 N 4
SFX 58 0 ае .
SFX 58 0 аеву .
SFX 58 0 аеро .
SFX 58 0 аест .

SFX 59 N 1
SFX 59 0 аев .

SFX 60 N 2
SFX 60 0 азор .
SFX 60 0 азори .

SFX 61 N 1
SFX 61 0 аи .

SFX 62 N 1
SFX 62 0 аинаи .

SFX 63 N 1
SFX 63 0 аино .

SFX 64 N 15
SFX 64 0 ак .
SFX 64 0 акам .
SFX 64 0 акамон .
SFX 64 0 акамро .
SFX 64 0 акат .
SFX 64 0 акатонро .
SFX 64 0 акатро .
SFX 64 0 акаш .
SFX 64 0 акаши .
SFX 64 0 акашон .
SFX 64 0 акашро .
SFX 64 0 аки .
SFX 64 0 аконаш .
SFX 64 0 акро .
SFX 64 0 аку .

SFX 65 N 8
SFX 65 0 акҳо .
SFX 65 0 акҳои .
SFX 65 0 акҳоро .
SFX 65 0 акҳоям .
SFX 65 0 акҳоят .
SFX 65 0 акҳоятону .
SFX 65 0 акҳояш .
SFX 65 0 акҳояшонро .

SFX 66 N 1
SFX 66 0 акҳое .

SFX 67 N 1
SFX 67 0 акҷон .

SFX 68 N 11
SFX 68 0 акӣ .
SFX 68 0 акиам .
SFX 68 0 акиаш .
SFX 68 0 акиашон .
SFX 68 0 акиашро .
SFX 68 0 акиву .
SFX 68 0 акии .
SFX 68 0 акиро .
SFX 68 0 акист .
SFX 68 0 акию .
SFX 68 0 акиям .

SFX 69 N 2
SFX 69 0 акаи .
SFX 69 0 акаро .

SFX 70 N 6
SFX 70 0 акак .
SFX 70 0 акакат .
SFX 70 0 акакаш .
SFX 70 0 акаки .
SFX 70 0 акакро .
SFX 70 0 акаку .

SFX 71 N 3
SFX 71 0 акаке .
SFX 71 0 акакеро .
SFX 71 0 акакест .

SFX 72 N 1
SFX 72 0 акбон .

SFX 73 N 1
SFX 73 0 аквор .

SFX 74 N 1
SFX 74 0 акдон .

SFX 75 N 3
SFX 75 0 аке .
SFX 75 0 акеро .
SFX 75 0 акест .

SFX 76 N 1
SFX 76 0 акзор .

SFX 77 N 3
SFX 77 0 акиҳо .
SFX 77 0 акиҳои .
SFX 77 0 акиҳоянд .

SFX 78 N 2
SFX 78 0 акие .
SFX 78 0 акиеро .

SFX 79 N 2
SFX 79 0 акмонанд .
SFX 79 0 акмонанди .

SFX 80 N 2
SFX 80 0 аков .
SFX 80 0 аковро .

SFX 81 N 1
SFX 81 0 акович .

SFX 82 N 13
SFX 82 0 акон .
SFX 82 0 аконам .
SFX 82 0 аконамро .
SFX 82 0 аконанд .
SFX 82 0 аконат .
SFX 82 0 аконаш .
SFX 82 0 аконашон .
SFX 82 0 аконашро .
SFX 82 0 аконем .
SFX 82 0 аконему .
SFX 82 0 акони .
SFX 82 0 аконро .
SFX 82 0 акону .

SFX 83 N 1
SFX 83 0 аконе .

SFX 84 N 2
SFX 84 0 акхон .
SFX 84 0 акхонро .

SFX 85 N 3
SFX 85 0 акчӣ .
SFX 85 0 акчии .
SFX 85 0 акчиро .

SFX 86 N 3
SFX 86 0 акча .
SFX 86 0 акчаам .
SFX 86 0 акчаи .

SFX 87 N 1
SFX 87 0 акчаҳо .

SFX 88 N 4
SFX 88 0 акчиён .
SFX 88 0 акчиёни .
SFX 88 0 акчиёнро .
SFX 88 0 акчиёну .

SFX 89 N 2
SFX 89 0 амӣ .
SFX 89 0 амиашон .

SFX 90 N 1
SFX 90 0 амандон .

SFX 91 N 1
SFX 91 0 аме .

SFX 92 N 1
SFX 92 0 амо .

SFX 93 N 2
SFX 93 0 амонанд .
SFX 93 0 амонанди .

SFX 94 N 17
SFX 94 0 ан .
SFX 94 0 анам .
SFX 94 0 анамон .
SFX 94 0 анамонро .
SFX 94 0 анамону .
SFX 94 0 анамро .
SFX 94 0 анат .
SFX 94 0 анатон .
SFX 94 0 анатонро .
SFX 94 0 анатро .
SFX 94 0 анаш .
SFX 94 0 анашон .
SFX 94 0 анашонро .
SFX 94 0 анашро .
SFX 94 0 ани .
SFX 94 0 анро .
SFX 94 0 ану .

SFX 95 N 10
SFX 95 0 анҳо .
SFX 95 0 анҳову .
SFX 95 0 анҳои .
SFX 95 0 анҳост .
SFX 95 0 анҳою .
SFX 95 0 анҳоям .
SFX 95 0 анҳоят .
SFX 95 0 анҳоятонро .
SFX 95 0 анҳояш .
SFX 95 0 анҳояшро .

SFX 96 N 1
SFX 96 0 анҳое .

SFX 97 N 16
SFX 97 0 анӣ .
SFX 97 0 аниам .
SFX 97 0 анианд .
SFX 97 0 аниаш .
SFX 97 0 аниашро .
SFX 97 0 аниву .
SFX 97 0 аниед .
SFX 97 0 анием .
SFX 97 0 ании .
SFX 97 0 аниро .
SFX 97 0 анист .
SFX 97 0 анию .
SFX 97 0 аниям .
SFX 97 0 аниянд .
SFX 97 0 анияти .
SFX 97 0 анияшон .

SFX 98 N 1
SFX 98 0 ангӣ .

SFX 99 N 3
SFX 99 0 ангаҳ .
SFX 99 0 ангаҳаш .
SFX 99 0 ангаҳи .

SFX 100 N 1
SFX 100 0 ангаҳе .

SFX 101 N 2
SFX 101 0 ангоҳ .
SFX 101 0 ангоҳи .

SFX 102 N 1
SFX 102 0 ангоҳе .

SFX 103 N 3
SFX 103 0 андӣ .
SFX 103 0 андиву .
SFX 103 0 андию .

SFX 104 N 22
SFX 104 0 анда .
SFX 104 0 андаам .
SFX 104 0 андаамон .
SFX 104 0 андаамро .
SFX 104 0 андаанд .
SFX 104 0 андаанду .
SFX 104 0 андааст .
SFX 104 0 андаат .
SFX 104 0 андаатон .
SFX 104 0 андаатонро .
SFX 104 0 андааш .
SFX 104 0 андаашон .
SFX 104 0 андаашонро .
SFX 104 0 андаашро .
SFX 104 0 андаву .
SFX 104 0 андагонро .
SFX 104 0 андаед .
SFX 104 0 андаем .
SFX 104 0 андаи .
SFX 104 0 андаро .
SFX 104 0 андаю .
SFX 104 0 андаям .

SFX 105 N 5
SFX 105 0 андаҳо .
SFX 105 0 андаҳои .
SFX 105 0 андаҳоро .
SFX 105 0 андаҳост .
SFX 105 0 андаҳоянд .

SFX 106 N 2
SFX 106 0 андаҳое .
SFX 106 0 андаҳоеро .

SFX 107 N 1
SFX 107 0 андаӣ .

SFX 108 N 1
SFX 108 0 андавор .

SFX 109 N 11
SFX 109 0 андагӣ .
SFX 109 0 андагиам .
SFX 109 0 андагиаш .
SFX 109 0 андагиашон .
SFX 109 0 андагиашро .
SFX 109 0 андагиву .
SFX 109 0 андагии .
SFX 109 0 андагиро .
SFX 109 0 андагист .
SFX 109 0 андагию .
SFX 109 0 андагияш .

SFX 110 N 1
SFX 110 0 андагиҳо .

SFX 111 N 1
SFX 111 0 андагие .

SFX 112 N 14
SFX 112 0 андагон .
SFX 112 0 андагонамон .
SFX 112 0 андагонанд .
SFX 112 0 андагонат .
SFX 112 0 андагонатонро .
SFX 112 0 андагонаш .
SFX 112 0 андагонашон .
SFX 112 0 андагонашонро .
SFX 112 0 андагонашро .
SFX 112 0 андагонед .
SFX 112 0 андагонем .
SFX 112 0 андагони .
SFX 112 0 андагонро .
SFX 112 0 андагону .

SFX 113 N 1
SFX 113 0 андагонӣ .

SFX 114 N 2
SFX 114 0 андагоне .
SFX 114 0 андагонеро .

SFX 115 N 3
SFX 115 0 андае .
SFX 115 0 андаеро .
SFX 115 0 андаест .

SFX 116 N 6
SFX 116 0 андар .
SFX 116 0 андарам .
SFX 116 0 андараш .
SFX 116 0 андарашро .
SFX 116 0 андари .
SFX 116 0 андарро .

SFX 117 N 1
SFX 117 0 андаре .

SFX 118 N 1
SFX 118 0 андасон .

SFX 119 N 1
SFX 119 0 андаст .

SFX 120 N 1
SFX 120 0 андасту .

SFX 121 N 1
SFX 121 0 андатар .

SFX 122 N 2
SFX 122 0 андатарин .
SFX 122 0 андатарини .

SFX 123 N 3
SFX 123 0 ане .
SFX 123 0 анест .
SFX 123 0 анею .

SFX 124 N 7
SFX 124 0 аниҳо .
SFX 124 0 аниҳову .
SFX 124 0 аниҳои .
SFX 124 0 аниҳоро .
SFX 124 0 аниҳост .
SFX 124 0 аниҳоям .
SFX 124 0 аниҳояш .

SFX 125 N 1
SFX 125 0 аниҳое .

SFX 126 N 1
SFX 126 0 анивор .

SFX 127 N 1
SFX 127 0 анигӣ .

SFX 128 N 3
SFX 128 0 ание .
SFX 128 0 аниеро .
SFX 128 0 аниест .

SFX 129 N 1
SFX 129 0 анитар .

SFX 130 N 1
SFX 130 0 анок .

SFX 131 N 2
SFX 131 0 ас .
SFX 131 0 аси .

SFX 132 N 1
SFX 132 0 астӣ .

SFX 133 N 5
SFX 133 0 атар .
SFX 133 0 атарам .
SFX 133 0 атаранд .
SFX 133 0 атари .
SFX 133 0 атару .

SFX 134 N 1
SFX 134 0 атаре .

SFX 135 N 3
SFX 135 0 атарин .
SFX 135 0 атарини .
SFX 135 0 атаринро .

SFX 136 N 1
SFX 136 0 ачӣ .

SFX 137 N 3
SFX 137 0 ача .
SFX 137 0 ачаи .
SFX 137 0 ачаро .

SFX 138 N 1
SFX 138 0 ачае .

SFX 139 N 1
SFX 139 0 аяки .

SFX 140 N 12
SFX 140 0 бон .
SFX 140 0 бонам .
SFX 140 0 бонанд .
SFX 140 0 бонат .
SFX 140 0 бонатон .
SFX 140 0 бонаш .
SFX 140 0 бонашон .
SFX 140 0 бонашу .
SFX 140 0 бонем .
SFX 140 0 бони .
SFX 140 0 бонро .
SFX 140 0 бону .

SFX 141 N 4
SFX 141 0 бонҳо .
SFX 141 0 бонҳову .
SFX 141 0 бонҳои .
SFX 141 0 бонҳоро .

SFX 142 N 8
SFX 142 0 бонӣ .
SFX 142 0 бониашон .
SFX 142 0 бониву .
SFX 142 0 бонии .
SFX 142 0 бониро .
SFX 142 0 боният .
SFX 142 0 бонияш .
SFX 142 0 бонияшон .

SFX 143 N 1
SFX 143 0 бонаки .

SFX 144 N 1
SFX 144 0 боне .

SFX 145 N 4
SFX 145 0 бонон .
SFX 145 0 бононанд .
SFX 145 0 бонони .
SFX 145 0 бонону .

SFX 146 N 1
SFX 146 0 бононе .

SFX 147 N 9
SFX 147 0 бор .
SFX 147 0 борам .
SFX 147 0 борат .
SFX 147 0 боратонро .
SFX 147 0 бораш .
SFX 147 0 борашон .
SFX 147 0 бори .
SFX 147 0 борро .
SFX 147 0 бору .

SFX 148 N 3
SFX 148 0 борҳо .
SFX 148 0 борҳои .
SFX 148 0 борҳоро .

SFX 149 N 5
SFX 149 0 борӣ .
SFX 149 0 бориву .
SFX 149 0 бориед .
SFX 149 0 бории .
SFX 149 0 бориро .

SFX 150 N 2
SFX 150 0 боре .
SFX 150 0 бореро .

SFX 151 N 4
SFX 151 0 бориҳо .
SFX 151 0 бориҳои .
SFX 151 0 бориҳоро .
SFX 151 0 бориҳояш .

SFX 152 N 3
SFX 152 0 борон .
SFX 152 0 борони .
SFX 152 0 боронро .

SFX 153 N 2
SFX 153 0 борона .
SFX 153 0 боронаи .

SFX 154 N 2
SFX 154 0 бортар .
SFX 154 0 бортаранд .
