third_party/hunspell_dictionaries/tg_TG.dic
ҳамондавр/35,62
бодом/25,852,35,36,64,65,87,5,7,29,337,338,859,402,855,453,14,15,787
бош/852,1,54,2,839,4,104,109,112,842,7,8,224,254,294,10,844,11,859,853,366,369,382,474,486,496,497,500,499,862,14,15
буд/852,35,36,39,43,49,2,90,839,91,3,94,95,4,103,842,124,858,5,7,8,254,274,29,10,11,12,859,853,403,862,856,863,538,15
гург/25,852,64,81,82,2,195,29,859,421,426,552,584,31,627,14,726,15
гуфт/25,852,35,36,39,43,58,2,839,91,94,95,96,97,4,842,124,125,128,858,5,7,8,29,10,11,859,853,862,863,580,684,685,687,689,15
дӯз/1,2,4,104,105,109,111,112,115,10,11,651,655
дар/25,852,1,2,3,857,4,104,108,109,112,115,118,5,7,8,140,141,142,144,145,224,227,254,255,258,29,11,859,853,366,369,374,382,389,469,470,472,473,862,580,31,636,649,651,655,661,663,669,14,15,787
диҳ/852,1,2,839,4,104,112,842,119,10,11,845,859,853,474,862,863
каҷ/852,64,84,29,859,344,853,855,421,862,856,14,15
кордиҳ/852,104,105,112
кушт/852,35,39,49,2,91,94,95,97,99,101,4,842,124,858,133,10,11,12,853,684,685,688,691,15
манъкард/95
мард/25,852,64,65,67,75,82,86,2,4,5,7,195,29,10,11,859,862,853,356,360,855,426,429,453,856,31,627,629,630,631,632,633,640,678,14,722,15
мардум/25,852,35,64,73,82,2,3,4,5,7,8,175,29,11,859,862,853,402,855,856,552,31,14,726,15
мешав/852,1,55,2,4,10,11,862
модар/25,33,852,64,2,3,857,4,116,5,6,7,8,195,29,11,859,862,853,855,863,580,31,627,14,15
монд/852,35,36,39,43,45,49,50,52,58,2,94,95,97,4,128,129,858,10,11,853,862,15
муҷмал/94,859,15
наёлуд/35,91,97
намешав/852,1,56,2,4,10,11
нишондиҳ/852,94,104,105,107,109,112,855
нобуд/852,35,43,2,124,7,8,859,855,853,863,539,15
обсофкун/852,64
олим/25,33,852,82,195,29,859,409,855,853,584,585,586,597,31,627,14,742,15,777
омӯхт/852,35,36,43,2,94,95,4,103,128,858,276,10,11,15
пал/25,68,64,72,76,82,7,859,344,855,787
паст/25,852,64,70,86,2,4,7,8,261,29,10,11,859,344,853,360,855,862,863,14,742,743,744,752,15
печ/25,852,35,1,64,85,89,104,7,29,859,366,369,374,375,376,377,382,384,390,855,474,475,502,610,31,636,649,651,654,655,661,663,669,676,679,14,15
писар/25,33,64,75,82,2,3,857,116,117,5,6,7,8,29,859,426,580,31,627,14,15,787,789,796,808,809
пул/25,852,65,68,64,2,857,4,5,6,7,8,302,29,859,862,853,402,855,569,14,15
пулгир/852,64,65,104,855
раҳмовар/113
разм/852,4,104,109,112,5,7,224,229,254,29,859,382,14,15
раст/39,35,43,50,51,53,58,2,94,97,4,124,125,128,858,276,11
рон/25,852,1,2,4,104,105,106,109,112,114,115,7,29,10,11,859,366,382,853,474,580,655,14
руст/852,35,2,94,97,101,4,124,127,128,859,853,855,15
себарг/35,36,60
секунҷ/35,36,58,93
серхаридор/70,859
серхон/104,122
соз/25,852,1,2,839,4,104,105,109,110,112,115,121,7,8,163,195,198,229,274,276,280,281,286,289,29,10,11,845,859,853,369,382,855,474,489,494,496,502,862,31,649,651,655,14,742,15
сутуд/35,2,91,94,97,129,133
тағйирдиҳ/852,104,115,859
талб/64,80,104,105,109,112,366,369,382,524,31,649,651
тараддудкун/104
тифл/25,852,64,75,82,83,2,857,5,6,7,8,29,859,862,853,855,863,31,627,14,15
тоб/25,1,64,2,104,109,121,5,7,8,302,303,29,10,859,366,369,382,474,475,502,516,569,572,578,31,627,649,651,679,14,15
торс/68,77,78
тохт/25,852,35,2,94,95,97,4,123,7,859,15
уд/25,2,92,4,7,29,859,855,552,14,15
фараҳ/852,98,5,276,29,859,853,539,540,541,544,547,569,14,15
фасл/25,75,7,29,859,14,15
фурӯхт/852,35,2,91,94,97,4,103,842,10,11,15
хал/1,104,109,120,852,366,369,382,31,636,649,651,654,655,661,663,669
хокрӯб/35,36,57,859,31
хон/25,852,1,64,2,839,3,4,104,105,106,112,114,115,842,858,5,6,7,195,29,10,11,845,12,859,344,862,853,360,362,855,474,475,477,496,502,863,856,580,31,649,651,655,661,669,699,14,729,15,787
хост/25,852,35,36,43,49,50,2,839,94,4,858,7,8,255,254,274,275,276,280,281,286,10,11,859,684,691,15
хурд/852,35,36,58,64,70,71,2,857,4,858,7,29,10,11,859,344,862,853,855,863,31,14,742,747,749,750,751,752,755,15
чанбар/25,35,64,75,79,7,302,29,859,421,552
чап/35,59,64,2,3,6,7,8,859,360,382,580,31,14,15
чароғ/25,852,64,65,66,2,4,5,7,8,195,198,302,305,29,10,337,859,426,453,31,14,15,786,787
чин/25,852,1,64,85,88,2,4,104,112,7,29,10,11,859,344,355,853,360,364,402,409,411,855,453,474,862,581,580,31,14,15
чорчен/69
шарм/25,2,104,105,108,109,122,5,7,223,248,249,250,252,254,255,29,859,369,382,421,569,571,14,726,729,733,15
широб/61
шош/74,859,366,382,15
шукркун/104,112,31
